Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3408
Insurer; seek recovery against program.

An insurer that defends or indemnifies a claim arising from the operation of a vehicle that is excluded under the terms of its policy shall have the right to seek recovery against the motor vehicle insurer of the program if the claim is made against the owner or driver for loss or injury that occurs during the sharing period.

Laws 2024, LB1073, § 8.